Maryland, session 2026, SB0382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–754.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER” MEANS A RESIDENT WHO:
(1) ON THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE YEAR, IS AT LEAST 77 YEARS
OLD; AND
(2) HAS FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME NOT EXCEEDING:
(I) $175,000 FOR A TAXPAYER FILING AS AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0382*

SENATE BILL 382
(II) $250,000 FOR SPOUSES FILING A JOINT RETURN OR FOR A
SURVIVING SPOUSE OR HEAD OF HOUSEHOLD AS DEFINED IN § 2 OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER FILING AS
AN INDIVIDUAL OR AS A SURVIVING SPOUSE OR HEAD OF HOUSEHOLD AS DEFINED
IN § 2 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E) OF THIS SECTION, AN
ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO:
(I) 25% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR, IF
THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER IS 77 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE YEAR;
(II) 50% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR, IF
THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER IS 78 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE YEAR;
(III) 75% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR, IF
THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER IS 79 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE YEAR;
AND
(IV) 100% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR,
IF THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER IS AT LEAST 80 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE
TAXABLE YEAR.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER FILING A
JOINT RETURN.
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E) OF THIS SECTION, AN
ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO:
(I) 25% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR AN ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER, IF BOTH SPOUSES ARE AT LEAST 77 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE
TAXABLE YEAR;
(II) 50% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR, IF
BOTH SPOUSES ARE AT LEAST 78 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE
YEAR;

SENATE BILL 382 3
(III) 75% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR, IF
BOTH SPOUSES ARE AT LEAST 79 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE
YEAR; AND
(IV) 100% OF THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR,
IF BOTH SPOUSES ARE AT LEAST 80 YEARS OLD ON THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE
YEAR.
(D) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE UNUSED AMOUNT
OF THE CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER TO ANY OTHER TAXABLE YEAR.
(E) AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY NOT CLAIM A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER CLAIMS A
CREDIT UNDER § 10–754 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.